Connecticut, session 2026, SB00460.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Treasurer shall conduct a study
2 of the feasibility, potential benefits and disadvantages of having the
3 balance of unredeemed gift certificates escheat to the state as unclaimed
4 property under chapter 32 of the general statutes after a certain number
5 of years. Not later than January 1, 2027, the Treasurer shall submit a
6 report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
7 statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
8 having cognizance of matters relating to government administration.
9 Such report shall include the results of such study and any
10 recommendations for statutory changes.
SB460 / File No. 501 1

SB460 File No. 501
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
GAE Joint Favorable
SB460 / File No. 501 2

SB460 File No. 501
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Treasurer to conduct a study of the feasibility,
potential benefits and disadvantages of having the balance of
unredeemed gift certificates escheat to the state as unclaimed property.
This does not result in any fiscal impact to the state as such study can be
conducted within available resources.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB460 / File No. 501 3

SB460 File No. 501
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 460
AN ACT CONCERNING A STUDY OF WHETHER UNCLAIMED GIFT
CERTIFICATES SHOULD BE CONSIDERED ABANDONED
PROPERTY.